apertium-nld-0.2.0/apertium-nld.nld.dix
<pardef n="bus/sen__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>sen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>sen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sen</l>       <r>sen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sen</l>       <r>sen<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="gerund"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ten</l>       <r>sen<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>sen<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>sen<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>sen<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>send</l>      <r>sen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sen</l>       <r>sen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>sen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>sen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>sen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sen</l>       <r>sen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>se</l>        <r>sen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>se</l>        <r>sen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>se</l>        <r>sen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="w/eten__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>eet</l>       <r>eten<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eet</l>       <r>eten<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eten</l>      <r>eten<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eten</l>      <r>eten<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="gerund"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isten</l>     <r>eten<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ist</l>       <r>eten<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ist</l>       <r>eten<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ist</l>       <r>eten<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>etend</l>     <r>eten<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eten</l>      <r>eten<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eet</l>       <r>eten<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eet</l>       <r>eten<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eet</l>       <r>eten<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eten</l>      <r>eten<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ete</l>       <r>eten<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ete</l>       <r>eten<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ete</l>       <r>eten<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="l/aten__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>aat</l>       <r>aten<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aat</l>       <r>aten<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aten</l>      <r>aten<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aten</l>      <r>aten<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="gerund"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ieten</l>     <r>aten<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iet</l>       <r>aten<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iet</l>       <r>aten<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iet</l>       <r>aten<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>atend</l>     <r>aten<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aten</l>      <r>aten<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aat</l>       <r>aten<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aat</l>       <r>aten<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aat</l>       <r>aten<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aten</l>      <r>aten<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ate</l>       <r>aten<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ate</l>       <r>aten<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ate</l>       <r>aten<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ent/en__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="gerund"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ten</l>       <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>end</l>       <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="bassen">          <i>bas</i><par n="bus/sen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="beboeten">        <i>beboet</i><par n="ent/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bebossen">        <i>bebos</i><par n="bus/sen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bekorten">        <i>bekort</i><par n="ent/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="belichten">       <i>belicht</i><par n="ent/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="berechten">       <i>berecht</i><par n="ent/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bersten">         <i>berst</i><par n="ent/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="beslechten">      <i>beslecht</i><par n="ent/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="beslissen">       <i>beslis</i><par n="bus/sen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="betrachten">      <i>betracht</i><par n="ent/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bevoorrechten">   <i>bevoorrecht</i><par n="ent/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="blussen">         <i>blus</i><par n="bus/sen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="boeten">          <i>boet</i><par n="ent/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bussen">          <i>bus</i><par n="bus/sen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="casten">          <i>cast</i><par n="ent/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dichten">         <i>dicht</i><par n="ent/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="enten">           <i>ent</i><par n="ent/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="flirten">         <i>flirt</i><par n="ent/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="gissen">          <i>gis</i><par n="bus/sen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="gisten">          <i>gist</i><par n="ent/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="grissen">         <i>gris</i><par n="bus/sen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="haasten">         <i>haast</i><par n="ent/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="hechten">         <i>hecht</i><par n="ent/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="hinten">          <i>hint</i><par n="ent/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="houten">          <i>hout</i><par n="ent/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="jachten">         <i>jacht</i><par n="ent/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="jassen">          <i>jas</i><par n="bus/sen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="kanten">          <i>kant</i><par n="ent/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="kissebissen">     <i>kissebis</i><par n="bus/sen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="klaverjassen">    <i>klaverjas</i><par n="bus/sen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="klussen">         <i>klus</i><par n="bus/sen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="korten">          <i>kort</i><par n="ent/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="krassen">         <i>kras</i><par n="bus/sen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="kussen">          <i>kus</i><par n="bus/sen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lassen">          <i>las</i><par n="bus/sen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="laten">           <i>l</i><par n="l/aten__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lichten">         <i>licht</i><par n="ent/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lossen">          <i>los</i><par n="bus/sen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lusten">          <i>lust</i><par n="ent/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="missen">          <i>mis</i><par n="bus/sen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="misten">          <i>mist</i><par n="ent/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="munten">          <i>munt</i><par n="ent/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ontgassen">       <i>ontgas</i><par n="bus/sen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ontkrachten">     <i>ontkracht</i><par n="ent/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ontmoeten">       <i>ontmoet</i><par n="ent/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ontwrichten">     <i>ontwricht</i><par n="ent/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="oogsten">         <i>oogst</i><par n="ent/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="overnachten">     <i>overnacht</i><par n="ent/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="passen">          <i>pas</i><par n="bus/sen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pesten">          <i>pest</i><par n="ent/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="plassen">         <i>plas</i><par n="bus/sen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pleiten">         <i>pleit</i><par n="ent/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="posten">          <i>post</i><par n="ent/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="proesten">        <i>proest</i><par n="ent/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="redetwisten">     <i>redetwist</i><par n="ent/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="onderrichten">    <i>onderricht</i><par n="ent/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rusten">          <i>rust</i><par n="ent/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sissen">          <i>sis</i><par n="bus/sen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="slachten">        <i>slacht</i><par n="ent/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sporten">         <i>sport</i><par n="ent/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="stichten">        <i>sticht</i><par n="ent/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="storten">         <i>stort</i><par n="ent/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tarten">          <i>tart</i><par n="ent/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tennissen">       <i>tennis</i><par n="bus/sen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="trachten">        <i>tracht</i><par n="ent/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="uiten">           <i>uit</i><par n="ent/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="verassen">        <i>veras</i><par n="bus/sen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="verdichten">      <i>verdicht</i><par n="ent/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="verfrissen">      <i>verfris</i><par n="bus/sen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="verkassen">       <i>verkas</i><par n="bus/sen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="verkrachten">     <i>verkracht</i><par n="ent/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="verlaten">        <i>verl</i><par n="l/aten__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="verlossen">       <i>verlos</i><par n="bus/sen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="vermissen">       <i>vermis</i><par n="bus/sen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="verpesten">       <i>verpest</i><par n="ent/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="verrassen">       <i>verras</i><par n="bus/sen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="verroesten">      <i>verroest</i><par n="ent/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="vissen">          <i>vis</i><par n="bus/sen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="vluchten">        <i>vlucht</i><par n="ent/en__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="wassen">          <i>was</i><par n="bus/sen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="weten">           <i>w</i><par n="w/eten__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="wissen">          <i>wis</i><par n="bus/sen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="wroeten">         <i>wroet</i><par n="ent/en__vblex"/></e>
